Wyoming, session 2026, HB0004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 42-4-103(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxxix) is amended to read:
42-4-103. Authorized services and supplies.
(a) Services and supplies authorized for medical
assistance under this chapter include:
(xxxix) Services provided by birthing centers as
defined by W.S. 35-2-901(a)(iii).
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2